Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 3
L

AKE LANIER ISLANDS DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY

Cross references.

- Powers of department and Board of Natural Resources as to development of Lake Lanier Islands,

§

12-3-4

.

12-3-310. Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

"Authority" means the Lake Lanier Islands Development Authority.

"Cost of project" means the cost of construction; the cost of all lands, properties, rights, easements, and franchises acquired; the cost of all machinery and equipment; financing charges; interest prior to and during construction, and for one year after completion of construction; cost of engineering; architectural and legal expenses, cost of plans and specifications, and other expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of the project; administrative expense; and such other expenses as may be necessary or incident to the financing authorized by this part. The term also means the construction of any project, the placing of the same in operation, and the condemnation of property necessary for such construction and operation. Any obligation or expense incurred for any of the foregoing purposes shall be regarded as a part of the cost of the project and may be paid or reimbursed as such out of the proceeds of revenue bonds issued under this part for such project.

"Islands" means such islands in Lake Lanier as were held by the state under a license from the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers on March 9, 1962.

(3.1) "Master plan" means that document to be created under the auspices of and adopted by the authority of one of its projects and as that master plan may be amended from time to time pursuant to Code Section 12-3-314.1.

"Project" means and includes one or a combination of two or more of the following: buildings, facilities, and all structures; electric, gas, steam, water, and sewerage utilities; and improvements of every kind and character deemed by the authority necessary or convenient for its purposes.

(Ga. L. 1968, p. 1132, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 397, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 105, § 19.)

12-3-311. Creation of authority; delegation of powers and duties; duration of authority's existence.

There is created a body corporate and politic to be known as the Lake Lanier Islands Development Authority, which shall be deemed an instrumentality of the State of Georgia and a public corporation and by that name, style, and title such body may contract and be contracted with, sue and be sued, implead and be impleaded, and complain and defend in all courts.

The authority may delegate to one or more of its members, or to its agents and employees, such powers and duties as it may deem proper.

The authority shall exist for 99 years and, upon the expiration thereof, shall exist for an additional 40 years.

The authority is assigned to the Department of Natural Resources for administrative purposes only.

(Ga. L. 1962, p. 736, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 1523; Ga. L. 2020, p. 827, § 1-1/HB 998.)

The 2020 amendment,

effective August 5, 2020, added "and, upon the expiration thereof, shall exist for an additional 40 years" at the end of subsection (c).

Cross references.

- Effect of assignment for administrative purposes,

§

50-4-3

.

12-3-312. Membership of authority; election of officers; bylaws; quorum; action by majority vote; voting by proxy; effect of vacancy; reimbursement for expenses; compensation of employees.

The authority shall consist of nine members as follows: the commissioner of natural resources or his or her designee and eight additional members appointed by the Governor as follows:

Five members from the state at large;

One member from Forsyth County;

One member from Hall County; and

One member from Gwinnett County.

Each member appointed by the Governor under this Code section shall serve for a term of four years, with the beginning and ending dates of terms to be specified by the Governor, and until his or her successor is appointed and has qualified.

The Governor shall appoint the chairperson of the authority for a term of one year from among the members of the authority. A member may serve no more than two consecutive terms as chairperson nor more than two terms as chairperson in any one four-year term as a member of the authority. The members of the authority shall elect one of their members as vice chairperson. They shall also elect a secretary and a treasurer who need not be members. The office of secretary and treasurer may be combined in one person.

The authority may make such bylaws for its government as is deemed necessary, but it is under no obligation to do so.

Any five members of the authority shall constitute a quorum necessary for the transaction of business; and a majority vote of those present at any meeting at which there is a quorum shall be sufficient to do and perform any action permitted to the authority by this part. However, no person shall be entitled to exercise or cast a proxy vote for any member. No vacancy on the authority shall impair the right of a quorum to transact any and all business as aforesaid.

The members shall receive no compensation for their services, but all members shall be entitled to be reimbursed for actual expenses, including travel and any other expenses, incurred while in the performance of their duties. Employees of the authority shall receive reasonable compensation, to be determined by the members of the authority, for their services.

All members of the authority shall immediately enter upon their duties without further act or formality.

(Ga. L. 1962, p. 736, § 2; Ga. L. 1964, p. 731, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 765, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 12; Ga. L. 1990, p. 872, § 4; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1692, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 105, § 20.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1995, in subsection (b), "four-year" was hyphenated in the second sentence and the hyphen was deleted from "vice chairperson" in the third sentence.

12-3-313. Accountability of members as trustees; maintenance of financial records and books; submitting records, books, and statement of financial position to state auditor.

The members of the authority shall be accountable in all respects as trustees. The authority shall keep suitable and proper books and records of all receipts, income, and expenditures of every kind and shall submit for inspection all the books together with the proper statement of the authority's financial position once a year on or about December 31 to the state auditor. The books and records shall be inspected and audited by the state auditor at least once in each year.

(Ga. L. 1962, p. 736, § 3; Ga. L. 1995, p. 105, § 21.)

12-3-314. Powers of authority generally.

The authority shall have power:

To have a seal and alter it at pleasure;

To acquire, hold, and dispose of personal property for its corporate purposes;

To appoint, select, and employ officers, agents, and employees, including engineering, architectural, and construction experts, fiscal agents, and attorneys; to contract for the services of individuals or organizations not employed full time by the authority who or which are engaged primarily in the rendition of personal services rather than the sale of goods or merchandise, such as, but not limited to, the services of attorneys, accountants, engineers, architects, consultants, and advisers, and to allow suitable compensation for such services; and to make provisions for group insurance, retirement, or other employee benefit arrangements, provided that no part-time or contract employees shall participate in group insurance or retirement benefits;

To make contracts and to execute all instruments necessary or convenient, including contracts for construction of projects or contracts with respect to the leasing or use of projects which the authority causes to be subdivided, erected, or acquired;

To plan, survey, subdivide, administer, construct, erect, acquire, own, repair, remodel, maintain, add to, extend, improve, equip, operate, and manage projects as defined in this part, such projects to be located on property owned or leased by the authority. The cost of any such project shall be paid from its income, from the proceeds of revenue anticipation certificates of the authority, or from such proceeds and any loan, gift, or grant from the United States or any agency or instrumentality thereof, or the State of Georgia, any county, municipal, or local government or governing body; provided, however, that the authority shall not undertake any such activity having a projected cost of over $1 million unless it has first evaluated the feasibility of involving private persons or entities in the development, construction, operation, and management of the authority's existing projects and such proposed activities and has filed a copy of such evaluation with the Office of Planning and Budget and the Recreational Authorities Overview Committee;

To accept loans or grants, or both, of money, materials, or property of any kind from the United States or any agency or instrumentality thereof, including the Department of Housing and Urban Development, upon such terms and conditions as the United States or such agency or instrumentality, including the Department of Housing and Urban Development, may impose;

To borrow money for any of its corporate purposes, to issue negotiable revenue anticipation certificates from earnings of such projects, and to provide for the payment of the same and for the rights of the holders thereof;

To exercise any power which is usually possessed by private corporations performing similar functions and which is not in conflict with the Constitution and laws of this state;

To act as agent for the United States, or any agency, department, corporation, or instrumentality thereof, in any manner within the purposes or powers of the authority;

To adopt, alter, or repeal its own bylaws, rules, and regulations governing the manner in which its business may be transacted and in which the power granted to it may be enjoyed, as the authority may deem necessary or expedient in facilitating its business;

To receive and accept loans, gifts, grants, donations, or contributions of property, facilities, or services, with or without consideration, from any person, firm, or corporation or from the State of Georgia, or any agency or instrumentality thereof, or from any county, municipal, or local government or governing body;

To hold, use, administer, and expend such sum or sums as may hereafter be received as income, gifts, or appropriations by authority of the General Assembly for any of the purposes of this authority;

To do any other things necessary or proper to beautify, improve, and render self-supporting the island park, to make its facilities available to people of average income, and to advertise its beauties to the world;

To acquire, lease (as lessee), purchase, hold, own, and use any franchise or any property, real or personal, tangible or intangible, or any interest therein; and to sell, lease (as lessor), transfer, or dispose thereof whenever the same is no longer required for purposes of the authority, or exchange the same for other property or rights which are useful for the purposes of the authority;

To fix, alter, charge, and collect fares, rates, rentals, and other charges for its facilities and for admission to the islands at reasonable rates to be determined exclusively by the authority;

To operate for hire boats, taxicabs, trains, trolleys, and other vehicles, systems, and facilities and other activities designed for the transportation of persons and property on the islands; to provide concessions, off-street parking, and other facilities for the comfort, safety, and convenience of visitors and other persons on the islands;

To invest and reinvest any or all idle funds or moneys, including, but not limited to, funds held in reserve or debt retirement or received through the issuance of revenue certificates or from contributions, gifts, or grants, which cannot be immediately used for the purpose for which received, such investment to be made in any security or securities which are legal investments for executors or trustees; provided, however, that investments in such securities will at all times be held for and, when sold, used for the purposes for which the money was originally received;

To grant, on an exclusive or nonexclusive basis, the right to use and occupy streets, roads, sidewalks, and other public places for the purpose of rendering utility services, upon such conditions and for such time as the authority may deem wise;

To do all things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly given in this part; and to do any and all other acts and things which this part authorizes or requires to be done, whether or not included in the general powers mentioned in this Code section; or

To sell or authorize others to sell, upon obtaining a license from the Department of Revenue, alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises only:

Upon property owned or controlled by the authority and located within the territorial limits of property controlled by the authority; and

Upon watercraft owned or controlled by the authority operating on Lake Sidney Lanier from such property.

The authority shall determine by resolution, as it may amend from time to time, the conditions, including hours and days of sale, under which such sales shall be permitted.

(Ga. L. 1962, p. 736, § 4; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1132, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1972, p. 3509, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 445, § 2; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1781, § 4; Ga. L. 1995, p. 105, § 22.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, a comma was deleted following "contracts" in paragraph (4).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1993, "$1 million" was substituted for "$1,000,000.00" in the second sentence of paragraph (5).

12-3-314.1. Master plan; creation; contents; notice and hearing on preliminary plan; adherence to plan; amendment.

The authority shall, on or before July 1, 1996, cause to be created a master plan for the management, preservation, protection, and development of each of its projects as defined in Code Section 12-3-310. The master plans for adjacent or contiguous projects may be combined into one document. The master plan for a project shall delineate, based upon aerial or other appropriate means of survey, the present and presently anticipated future uses of the land area of each project and shall also designate areas to be managed as environmentally sensitive and active use areas.

In the creation of a master plan for a project, the authority shall, after preparation of a preliminary plan, give notice of the existence of the preliminary plan in the legal organ of the county in which the project is located and in at least two newspapers of state-wide general circulation not less than 60 days prior to the meeting of the authority at which the preliminary plan is to be considered for final adoption. After giving this notice, the authority shall hold a public hearing at a convenient location and receive and consider such oral and written comments on the preliminary plan as may be presented.

The authority, in the exercise of its authority to develop, manage, preserve, and protect its projects, shall be guided by and shall adhere to the master plan for a project, as the same may from time to time be amended as provided in subsection (d) of this Code section.

The authority may from time to time amend the master plan for a project, but only in compliance with the following procedure:

Any proposed amendment to a master plan shall be described in written form and, if capable of such description, in visual form and presented publicly at a regular meeting of the authority;

After the proposed amendment is presented publicly at a regular meeting of the authority, a brief summary of the proposed amendment shall be advertised in the legal organ of the county where the project is located, distributed to the media by news release, and published in appropriate publications of the authority. Each such advertisement, news release, and publication shall also contain:

The time and place of the public hearing on the proposed amendment, which public hearing shall be held no earlier than 15 days after the latest publication of the advertisement in the legal organ as required by this paragraph;

Directions as to the manner of receiving comments from the public regarding the proposed amendment; and

The date on which the meeting of the authority at which the proposed amendment will be considered for approval or rejection, which meeting shall not be held any sooner than 30 days after the meeting of the authority at which the proposed change was announced pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection;

The authority shall transmit three copies of the information required by paragraph (2) of this subsection to the Office of Legislative Counsel at least 30 days prior to the date of the meeting at which the proposed amendment will be considered. The Office of Legislative Counsel shall immediately furnish the presiding officers of each house of the General Assembly with a copy of the information received. The presiding officers, or the Office of Legislative Counsel if a presiding officer is unavailable, shall then assign the information to the chairperson of the appropriate standing committee in each house for review and provide copies to any member of that house who makes or has made a written request;

In the event a standing committee to which the information has been assigned as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection files an objection to a proposed amendment to the master plan with the chairperson of the authority prior to the authority's taking action on the proposed amendment and the authority adopts the proposed amendment over the objection, the authority shall notify the presiding officers of the Senate and House of Representatives, the chairpersons of the standing committees to which the information was referred, and the Office of Legislative Counsel within ten days after the adoption of the amendment to the master plan. Thereafter, by introduction of a resolution to override the amendment within the first 30 days of the next regular session of the General Assembly, the amendment may be considered by the branch of the General Assembly whose committee objected to its adoption. In the event the resolution is adopted by the members of the branch of the General Assembly in which it is introduced, it shall be immediately transferred to the other branch of the General Assembly, which branch shall consider the resolution within five days of its being received. In the event the resolution to override the amendment to the master plan is adopted by a vote of two-thirds of the members of each branch, the amendment to the master plan shall be void on the day after the adoption of the resolution by the second branch of the General Assembly. In the event the resolution is ratified by a vote of less than two-thirds of the members of either house, the resolution shall be submitted to the Governor for approval or veto. In the event the resolution fails to pass both houses or is vetoed by the Governor, the amendment to the master plan shall remain in effect. In the event of the Governor's approval of the resolution, the amendment to the master plan shall be void on the day after the date of the Governor's approval of the resolution;

Any proposed changes to the boundaries of any area or areas delineated on a master plan as a part of an area designated to be managed as environmentally sensitive shall, at least seven days prior to the public hearing required by paragraph (2) of this subsection, be surveyed and marked in such a fashion as to be readily discernible on the ground by members of the public; and

At the meeting of the authority which has been identified in the advertisement required by paragraph (2) of this subsection as the meeting to consider the approval or rejection of the proposed amendment, the authority shall consider in an open and public meeting the proposed amendment to the master plan, which, if approved, shall become a part of the master plan for that project, subject, however, to the provisions of paragraph (4) of this subsection.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-314.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 105, § 23; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 12.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1995, "develop" was substituted for "development" in subsection (c); and, in subsection (d), a comma was added following "news release" in the introductory language in paragraph (d)(2) and "the" was deleted preceding "Legislative Counsel" in the third sentence in paragraph (d)(3) and from near the end of the first sentence in paragraph (d)(4).

12-3-315. Exercise of police powers by authority; delegation of powers.

The authority is empowered to exercise such of the police powers of the state as may be necessary to maintain peace and order and to enforce any and all zoning, use, and personal conduct restrictions upon the properties, facilities, and persons under its jurisdiction to the extent that such is lawful under the laws of the nation and the state. In addition, and upon the adoption by the authority of a resolution so stating, the authority is empowered to exercise the police powers of the state in areas up to within 300 yards of the shoreline of the islands, as such areas are specified in the resolution. The authority may delegate all or any part of the performance of these functions temporarily or permanently to the state or to the county in which the park is located.

The authority shall have legislative power to adopt reasonable ordinances relating to the property, affairs, and administration of Lake Lanier Islands for which no provision has been made by general law and which are not inconsistent with the general laws and Constitution of the State of Georgia. The authority is further authorized to adopt ordinances adopting by reference any or all of the provisions of Chapter 6 of Title 40 in the same manner as a local authority under Code Section 40-6-372. Within the limits of the Lake Lanier Islands, the authority is authorized to appoint security officers who are authorized and empowered to serve and execute warrants and to make arrests for violation of ordinances adopted by the authority. Within the limits of Lake Lanier Islands, such security officers shall have the same authority, powers, and privileges regarding enforcement of laws as sheriffs of this state. Prosecutions for violations of the ordinances of the authority shall be in the magistrate court as provided in Article 4 of Chapter 10 of Title 15. The authority may provide that ordinance violations may be tried upon citations with or without a prosecuting attorney as well as upon accusations in the manner prescribed in Code Section 15-10-63.

The maximum punishment for violation of such an ordinance shall be stated in the ordinance and shall not exceed a fine of $500.00 or imprisonment for 60 days, or both, except that an ordinance adopting the provisions of Code Section 40-6-391 shall provide the same punishment as provided by Code Section 40-6-391 for violations of that Code section.

All of the provisions of any ordinances and resolutions adopted by the authority which are in force and effect as of April 2, 1987, and which are not inconsistent with nor repugnant to this Code section and not in conflict with the Constitution or the general laws of the State of Georgia or the Constitution of the United States shall remain in full force and effect, provided that the authority may at any time repeal, alter, or amend any of the provisions of said ordinances and resolutions.

(Ga. L. 1962, p. 736, § 10; Ga. L. 1980, p. 765, § 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 445, § 1.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1987, "April 2, 1987," was substituted for "the effective date of this Code section" in subsection (d).

12-3-316. Security force.

The authority shall have the power to contract for or to provide for and maintain a security force with respect to the facilities and property owned, leased, operated, or under the control of the authority, and within the territory thereof. The security force shall have the duty to protect persons and property, dispense unlawful or dangerous assemblages, control pedestrian and vehicular traffic, and otherwise preserve and protect the public peace, health, and safety. For these purposes, a member of such force shall be a peace officer and, as such, shall have authority equivalent to the authority of a policeman or law enforcement officer of the county in which he is discharging his duties.

(Ga. L. 1968, p. 1132, § 5.)

12-3-317. Lease payments by authority as constituting good, valuable, and sufficient consideration.

It is found, determined, and declared that the consideration paid and given and to be paid and given to the State of Georgia by the authority for its leasehold, and privileges thereunder, is good and valuable and sufficient consideration therefor and that this action on the part of the authority and the state is in the interest of the public welfare of the State of Georgia and its citizens.

(Ga. L. 1962, p. 736, § 6.)

12-3-318. Purposes for which income, gifts, grants, appropriations, bonds, or loans may be used; consultation with others; projects for Lake Lanier Watershed area.

All income, revenues, gifts, grants, appropriations, bond or loan proceeds, and rights and privileges of value of every nature accruing to the authority shall be used:

Primarily for the purpose of beautifying, improving, developing, maintaining, administering, managing, and promoting the islands in Lake Lanier; and

Secondarily for the purpose of beautifying, improving, developing, maintaining, administering, managing, and promoting any other real property which is:

Under the management and control of the department or the North Georgia Mountains Authority whether held in fee simple or under or through a contract, license, lease, or other similar agreement with an agency of the federal government; and

Adjacent to any lake or reservoir in this state that is under the management and control of the United States Army Corps of Engineers.

The authority shall accomplish the purposes provided in subsection (a) of this Code section at the lowest rates reasonable and possible for the benefit of the people of the State of Georgia for recreational purposes.

Prior to authorizing the expenditure of funds for any of the secondary purposes set forth in subsection (a) of this Code section, the authority shall consult with the Senate Economic Development Committee, the House Committee on Game, Fish, and Parks, and the Governor for the purpose of assistance in establishing the priority of needs among the real properties eligible to receive the benefit of such expenditure.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, with regard to revenues received by the authority from property management contracts or agreements or leases of real property by the authority, 75 percent of all such revenues shall be retained by the authority for use in projects in the Lake Lanier Watershed area.

(Ga. L. 1962, p. 736, § 5; Ga. L. 1999, p. 835, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 222, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 303, § 5/HB 117.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2003, subsection (c), as enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 222,

§

1, was redesignated as subsection (d).

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2009, p. 303,

§

20/HB 117, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "This Act is intended to reflect the current internal organization of the Georgia Senate and House of Representatives and is not otherwise intended to change substantive law. In the event of a conflict with any other Act of the 2009 General Assembly, such other Act shall control over this Act."

12-3-319. Location, construction, improvement, and maintenance of highways, streets, roads, and rights of way.

The State Transportation Board, or its successors, and the Department of Transportation are authorized to make such studies and estimates in connection with the location and relocation of highways, roads, streets, and rights of way in connection with the islands, whether within or without the islands, as may be necessary to the location or relocation of any roads, streets, or highways within or without the islands. The board and the department may, at the expense of the department, locate or relocate such roads, streets, and highways so as to conform to the plan of the authority for the development and improvement of the islands.

The authority may grant rights of way and easements for highways and roads within the islands to the Department of Transportation, and the department is authorized and empowered to lay out, construct, improve, and maintain any such roads and rights of way. The cost of any such undertaking shall be deemed to be a proper and legitimate expense of the department.

The State Transportation Board, or its successors, and the Department of Transportation are empowered to acquire, in any manner now permitted by law, real property, any interest therein, or rights of way for the location and relocation of highways and roads located in proximity to the islands and are authorized and empowered to expend any funds available to such board or such department for the purpose of such locating and relocating, and for constructing, improving, and maintaining any such highways and roads. The cost of any such undertaking shall be deemed a proper and legitimate expense of such board or such department.

(Ga. L. 1969, p. 397, § 3.)

12-3-320. Power of authority to survey, subdivide, improve, and lease island property.

The authority is empowered to survey, subdivide, improve, and lease as subdivided any of the property of the islands in Lake Lanier.

(Ga. L. 1962, p. 736, § 7.)

12-3-321. Restrictions under lease; restrictions on subleasing.

The leasing of the property shall be for not more than 50 years under stringent restrictive limitations as to use, the style and character of the structures allowable thereon, and such other limitations as the authority may deem wise; and all such restrictions shall be incorporated in the leases as covenants providing for forfeiture upon breach. No sublease by any tenant of the authority shall be legal without the approval of the authority.

(Ga. L. 1962, p. 736, § 8.)

12-3-322. Leasing of property by competitive bidding.

Only after notice is published once a week for four weeks in the official organs of all the counties bordering Lake Lanier and in the official organ of Fulton County, the property described in this part shall be leased as deemed appropriate by the authority at public auction or by sealed competitive bids. The authority shall have the privilege of setting minimum prices below which no bid for lease shall be accepted. When in the opinion of the authority the public welfare demands it, the authority may conclude any authorized lease by private negotiation after first giving notice to the Attorney General of the particulars.

(Ga. L. 1962, p. 736, § 9.)

12-3-323. Revenue bonds - Power of authority to issue bonds; payment of principal and interest; dating of bonds; determination of maturity dates, interest rates, and medium of payments; redemption before maturity.

The authority, or any authority or body which has succeeded or which may in the future succeed to the powers, duties, and liabilities vested in the authority, shall have power and is authorized at one time, or from time to time, to provide by resolution for the issuance of negotiable revenue bonds for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost, as defined in this part, of any one project or a combination of projects. The principal and interest of such revenue bonds shall be payable solely from the special fund provided in Code Section 12-3-334 for such payment. The bonds of each issue shall be dated and shall mature at such times and bear interest at such rates as may be determined by the authority, payable in such medium of payment as to both principal and interest as may be determined by the authority, and may be made redeemable before maturity, at the option of the authority, at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the authority in the resolution providing for the issuance of the bonds.

(Ga. L. 1962, p. 736, §§ 11, 13; Ga. L. 1969, p. 397, § 2.)

Cross references.

- Revenue bonds generally,

§

36-82-60

et seq.

12-3-324. Revenue bonds - Form of bonds; interest coupons; denominations; place of payment; issuance in coupon or registered form; registration of coupon bonds.

The authority shall determine the form of the bonds, including any interest coupons to be attached thereto, and shall fix the denomination or denominations of the bonds and the place or places of payment of principal and interest thereof, which may be at any bank or trust company within or without the state. The bonds may be issued in coupon or registered form, or both, as the authority may determine, and provision may be made for the registration of any coupon bond as to principal alone and also as to both principal and interest.

(Ga. L. 1962, p. 736, § 13; Ga. L. 1969, p. 397, § 2.)

12-3-325. Revenue bonds - Signatures; seal.

In case any officer whose signature appears on any bonds or whose facsimile signature appears on any coupon ceases to be such officer before the delivery of such bonds, such signature shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he had remained in office until such delivery. All such bonds shall be signed by the chairman or vice-chairman of the authority, and the official seal of the authority shall be affixed thereto and attested by the secretary or assistant secretary of the authority; and any coupons attached thereto shall bear the signature or facsimile signature of the chairman or vice-chairman of the authority. Any coupon may bear the facsimile signature of such person, and any bond may be signed, sealed, and attested on behalf of the authority by such persons as at the actual time of the execution of such bonds shall be duly authorized or hold the proper office, although at the date of such bonds such persons may not have been so authorized or shall not have held such office.

(Ga. L. 1962, p. 736, § 13; Ga. L. 1969, p. 397, § 2.)

12-3-326. Revenue bonds - Status as negotiable instruments; tax exemption for bonds and income therefrom.

All revenue bonds issued under this part shall have and are declared to have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments. Such bonds and the income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation within the state.

(Ga. L. 1962, p. 736, § 12; Ga. L. 1969, p. 397, § 2.)

12-3-327. Revenue bonds - Manner of sale; determination of price; use and manner of disbursement of proceeds.

The authority may sell bonds in such manner and for such price as it may determine to be for the best interests of the authority.

The proceeds of bonds shall be used solely for the payment of the cost of project and shall be disbursed upon requisition or order of the chairman or vice-chairman of the authority under such restrictions, if any, as provided by the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or by the trust indenture mentioned in Code Section 12-3-332.

(Ga. L. 1969, p. 397, § 2.)

12-3-328. Revenue bonds - Issuance of interim receipts, interim certificates, and temporary bonds.

Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the authority may, under like restrictions, issue interim receipts, interim certificates, or temporary bonds, with or without coupons, exchangeable for definitive bonds upon the issuance of the latter.

(Ga. L. 1969, p. 397, § 2.)

12-3-329. Revenue bonds - Replacement of mutilated, destroyed, or lost bonds.

The authority may provide for the replacement of any bond which becomes mutilated or is destroyed or lost.

(Ga. L. 1969, p. 397, § 2.)

12-3-330. Revenue bonds - Bonds; application of bonds of a single issue as payment for one or more projects; immediate effectiveness of resolutions providing for issuance of bonds; time and manner of passage of resolutions.

Revenue bonds may be issued without the conducting of any proceedings, the existence of any conditions, or the happening of any events other than those proceedings, conditions, and events which are specified or required by this part. In the discretion of the authority, revenue bonds of a single issue may be issued for the purpose of paying the cost of any one or more, including a combination of, projects at any one institution or any number of institutions. Any resolution providing for the issuance of revenue bonds under this part shall become effective immediately upon its passage and need not be published or posted. Any such resolution may be passed at any regular, special, or adjourned meeting of the authority by a majority of its members.

(Ga. L. 1969, p. 397, § 2.)

12-3-331. Revenue bonds - Status as constituting debt or pledge of faith or credit of state; effect of issuance on obligation of state to tax or make appropriations; recitals on face of bonds.

Revenue bonds issued under this part shall not be deemed to constitute a debt of the State of Georgia or a pledge of the faith and credit of the state. Such bonds shall be payable solely from the fund provided for in Code Section 12-3-334, and the issuance of such revenue bonds shall not directly, indirectly, or contingently obligate the state to levy or to pledge any form of taxation whatever therefor or to make any appropriation for their payment. All such bonds shall contain recitals on their faces covering substantially the foregoing provisions of this Code section. Anything in this Code section to the contrary notwithstanding, such funds as may be received from state appropriations or from any other source are declared to be available and may be used by any department, board, commission, or agency of the State of Georgia for the performance of any lease contract entered into by such department, board, commission, or agency.

(Ga. L. 1962, p. 736, § 12; Ga. L. 1969, p. 397, § 2.)